Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.155.020

Gifts, grants, donations.

The joint center for aerospace technology innovation may solicit and receive gifts, grants, donations, sponsorships, or contributions from any federal, state, or local governmental agency or program or any private source, and expend the same for any purpose consistent with this chapter.

[ 2012 c 242 s 2.]

NOTES:

Sunset Act application: See note following chapter digest.